New Jersey, session 221, A2605.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A county college shall permit a high school student to enroll in courses offered through a career certificate program provided that there is available classroom space and the student: (1) is a resident of the State; (2) is 16 years of age or older and is enrolled in grade 12; (3) maintains good academic standing; and (4) obtains written permission from the principal of the high school at which the student is enrolled. b.  A student enrolling in a credit course towards a career certification or license pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall not be required to have a State-endorsed diploma or have completed the General Educational Development Test prior to enrolling in the courses. c.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a county college to waive its prerequisite course requirements or application procedures for any program, department, or school of the county college. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year next following the date of enactment.